Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF938.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin REDWOOD AREA INDEPENDENT SCHOOL DISTRICT; REFUNDABLE SALES AND USE TAX EXEMPTION FOR CONSTRUCTION MATERIALS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Exemption; refund. new text end new text begin (a) Materials and supplies used or consumed in and equipment incorporated into the construction, reconstruction, upgrade, expansion, renovation, or remodeling of Redwood Valley Elementary in Independent School District No. 2897, Redwood Falls, are exempt from sales and use tax imposed under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 297A, if materials, supplies, and equipment are purchased after March 11, 2024, and before September 9, 2026. new text end new text begin (b) The tax must be imposed and collected as if the rate under Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.62, subdivisions 1 and 1a, applied and then refunded in the same manner provided for projects under Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.75, subdivision 1, clause (17). new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin The amount required to pay the refunds under subdivision 1 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of revenue. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective retroactively for sales and purchases made after March 11, 2024, and before September 9, 2026. new text end